Montana, session 2025, HB384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-15-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-15-303. Qualifications. (1) To be eligible for licensing by the board as a speech-language
pathologist or audiologist, the applicant:
(a) must meet the current academic, supervised clinical practicum, and supervised professional
experience requirements as defined by board rule; and
(b) shall pass an examination approved by the board.
(2) (a) To be eligible for licensing by the board as a speech-language pathology assistant or an
audiology assistant, the applicant:
(i) must have completed the academic requirements as defined by board rule; or
(ii) shall provide evidence to the board that the applicant served as an unlicensed speech-
language pathology assistant or an unlicensed audiology assistant sufficient to meet the requirements in
subsection (2)(a)(i) for a period prior to January 1, 2024 July 15, 2025.
(b) The board shall provide by rule the type of evidence and conditions to meet equivalency for
current academic experience.
(c) Licensure for speech-language pathology assistants qualifying under subsection (2)(a)(ii) must
be retroactive to the date in which the board rules establishing equivalency were satisfied.
(3) The standards defined by the board must be equal to or greater than the standards generally
accepted as the national norm."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 384
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 384
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 384
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 384, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 384
INTRODUCED BY J. LYNCH, B. EDWARDS, J. ISALY, M. LEE, P. STRAND, J. SECKINGER, B. CLOSE, S.
FYANT, J. SOOKTIS, M. CUNNINGHAM, E. BUTTREY, E. MATTHEWS, T. RUNNING WOLF, F. SMITH, D.
BAUM, B. CARTER, J. COHENOUR, D. HAWK, C. KEOGH, K. KORTUM, M. ROMANO, E. STAFMAN, M.
MARLER, S. DEMAROIS
AN ACT REVISING THE DATES TO APPLY FOR A SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGIST OR AUDIOLOGIST
LICENSE; AMENDING SECTION 37-15-303, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”